Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 2. PUBLIC EDUCATION

SUBTITLE B. STATE AND REGIONAL ORGANIZATION AND GOVERNANCE

CHAPTER 7. STATE ORGANIZATION

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 7.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "board" means the State Board of Education.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.002. TEXAS EDUCATION AGENCY: COMPOSITION AND PURPOSE. (a) The commissioner of education and the agency staff comprise the Texas Education Agency.

(b) The agency shall carry out the educational functions specifically delegated under Section 7.021, 7.055, or another provision of this code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.003. LIMITATION ON AUTHORITY. An educational function not specifically delegated to the agency or the board under this code is reserved to and shall be performed by school districts or open-enrollment charter schools.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.004. SUNSET PROVISION. (a) The Texas Education Agency is subject to Chapter 325, Government Code (Texas Sunset Act). Unless continued in existence as provided by that chapter, the agency is abolished September 1, 2029.

(b) As part of the Sunset Advisory Commission's review of the agency under Subsection (a), the commission in coordination with the agency shall select for review three regional education service centers that serve diverse geographic areas of the state and diverse population sizes. The commission's review of the agency must include an evaluation of the agency's oversight of the centers.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1227 (H.B. 1116), Sec. 1.05(a), eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 8.01, eff. May 31, 2006.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 2 (S.B. 2), Sec. 2.01, eff. July 10, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1279 (H.B. 1675), Sec. 1.01(a), eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 938 (H.B. 3123), Sec. 3.01, eff. June 18, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 596 (S.B. 619), Sec. 4.01, eff. June 10, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 941 (S.B. 1659), Sec. 1.01, eff. June 18, 2023.

Sec. 7.005. COOPERATION BETWEEN STATE AGENCIES OF EDUCATION. The State Board of Education and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, in conjunction with other appropriate agencies, shall ensure that long-range plans and educational programs established by each board provide a comprehensive education for the students of this state under the jurisdiction of that board, extending from early childhood education through postgraduate study. In assuring that programs are coordinated, the boards shall use the P-16 Council established under Section 61.076.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 820, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 4.001, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 7.006. COORDINATION OF RECORDS. The commissioner of education and the commissioner of higher education shall ensure that records relating to student performance held by the Texas Education Agency and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board are coordinated and maintained in standardized, compatible formats that permit:

(1) the exchange of information between the agencies; and

(2) the matching of individual student records so that a student's academic performance may be assessed throughout the student's educational career.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 834, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 7.008. PUBLIC ACCESS TO PEIMS DATA. (a) The commissioner with the assistance of an advisory panel described by Subsection (b) shall develop a request for proposal for a qualified third-party contractor to develop and implement procedures to make available, through the agency Internet website, all financial and academic performance data submitted through the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS) for school districts and campuses.

(b) The commissioner shall appoint an advisory panel to assist the commissioner in developing requirements for a system that is easily accessible by the general public and contains information of primary relevance to the public. The advisory panel shall consist of:

(1) educators;

(2) interested stakeholders;

(3) business leaders; and

(4) other interested members of the public.

(c) The procedures developed under this section must provide:

(1) a summarized format easily understood by the public for reporting financial and academic performance information on the agency Internet website; and

(2) the ability for those who access the Internet website to view and download state, district, and campus level information.

(d) This section does not authorize the disclosure of student information that may not be disclosed under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g). The commissioner shall adopt rules to protect the confidentiality of student information.

(e) Expired.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 2.02, eff. May 31, 2006.

Sec. 7.010. ELECTRONIC STUDENT RECORDS SYSTEM. (a) In this section, "institution of higher education" has the meaning assigned by Section 61.003.

(b) Each school district, open-enrollment charter school, and institution of higher education shall participate in an electronic student records system that satisfies standards approved by the commissioner of education and the commissioner of higher education.

(c) The electronic student records system must permit an authorized state or district official or an authorized representative of an institution of higher education to electronically transfer to and from an educational institution in which the student is enrolled and retrieve student transcripts, including information concerning a student's:

(1) course or grade completion;

(2) teachers of record;

(3) assessment instrument results;

(4) receipt of special education services, including placement in a special education program and the individualized education program developed; and

(5) personal graduation plan as described by Section 28.0212 or 28.02121, as applicable.

(d) The commissioner of education or the commissioner of higher education may solicit and accept grant funds to maintain the electronic student records system and to make the system available to school districts, open-enrollment charter schools, and institutions of higher education.

(e) A private or independent institution of higher education, as defined by Section 61.003, may participate in the electronic student records system under this section. If a private or independent institution of higher education elects to participate, the institution must provide the funding to participate in the system.

(f) Any person involved in the transfer and retrieval of student information under this section is subject to any state or federal law governing the release of or providing access to any confidential information to the same extent as the educational institution from which the data is collected. A person may not release or distribute the data to any other person in a form that contains confidential information.

Added by Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 3.01, eff. May 31, 2006.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 1(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Sec. 7.012. MODEL DATA-SHARING AGREEMENTS. The agency, the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, and the Texas Workforce Commission jointly shall develop and make available the following model data-sharing agreements for sharing information subject to the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g) for purposes of system evaluation and improved support of students and workforce preparation participants:

(1) a model data-sharing agreement for public schools and public and private institutions of higher education to share that information with entities authorized to receive that information for use in ongoing system evaluation and improvement purposes or whose employees or contractors are school officials for purposes of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974; and

(2) a model data-sharing agreement for reciprocal sharing of that information between:

(A) public schools;

(B) public or private institutions of higher education;

(C) state and local workforce entities; and

(D) entities authorized to receive that information for use in ongoing system evaluation and improvement purposes or whose employees or contractors are school officials for purposes of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 788), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

SUBCHAPTER B. TEXAS EDUCATION AGENCY

Sec. 7.021. TEXAS EDUCATION AGENCY POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The agency shall perform the educational functions provided by Subsection (b).

(b)(1) The agency shall administer and monitor compliance with education programs required by federal or state law, including federal funding and state funding for those programs.

(2) The agency shall conduct research, analysis, and reporting to improve teaching and learning.

(3) The agency shall conduct hearings involving state school law at the direction and under the supervision of the commissioner.

(4) The agency shall establish and implement pilot programs established by this title.

(5) The agency shall carry out the duties relating to the investment capital fund under Section 7.024.

(6) The agency shall develop and implement a teacher recruitment program as provided by Section 21.004.

(7) The agency shall carry out duties under the Texas Advanced Placement Incentive Program under Subchapter C, Chapter 28.

(8) The agency shall carry out powers and duties relating to community education as required under Subchapter H, Chapter 29.

(9) The agency shall develop a program of instruction in driver education and traffic safety as provided by Section 29.902.

(10) The agency shall carry out duties assigned under Section 30.002 concerning children with visual impairments.

(11) The agency shall carry out powers and duties related to regional day school programs for the deaf as provided under Subchapter D, Chapter 30.

(12) The agency shall establish and maintain an electronic information transfer system as required under Section 32.032, maintain and expand telecommunications capabilities of school districts and regional education service centers as required under Section 32.033, and establish technology demonstration programs as required under Section 32.035.

(13) The agency shall review school district budgets, audit reports, and other fiscal reports as required under Sections 44.008 and 44.010 and prescribe forms for financial reports made by or for school districts to the commissioner or the agency as required under Section 44.009.

(14) The agency shall cooperate with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in connection with the Texas partnership and scholarship program under Subchapter Q, Chapter 61.

(c) The agency may enter into an agreement with a federal agency concerning a project related to education, including the provision of school lunches and the construction of school buildings. Not later than the 30th day before the date the agency enters into an agreement under this subsection concerning a new project or reauthorizing a project, the agency must provide written notice, including a description of the project, to:

(1) the governor;

(2) the Legislative Budget Board; and

(3) the presiding officers of the standing committees of the senate and of the house of representatives with primary jurisdiction over the agency.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 6.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 27.002(2), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 73 (S.B. 307), Sec. 2.01, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 7.022. INTERNAL AUDIT. The auditor appointed by the commissioner under Section 7.055 shall coordinate the agency's efforts to evaluate and improve its internal operations.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1122, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 7.023. AGENCY EMPLOYMENT POLICY. A decision of the agency relating to employment shall be made without regard to a person's race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.024. INVESTMENT CAPITAL FUND. (a) The investment capital fund consists of money appropriated for purposes of the fund. The agency shall administer the fund. The purposes of this fund are to assist eligible public schools to implement practices and procedures consistent with deregulation and school restructuring in order to improve student achievement and to help schools identify and train parents and community leaders who will hold the school and the school district accountable for achieving high academic standards.

(b) The commissioner may make grants from the fund to eligible schools.

(c) A school is eligible to apply for a grant if the school has demonstrated a commitment to campus deregulation and to restructuring educational practices and conditions at the school by entering into a partnership with:

(1) school staff;

(2) parents of students at the school;

(3) community and business leaders;

(4) school district officers;

(5) a nonprofit, community-based organization that has a demonstrated capacity to train, develop, and organize parents and community leaders into a large, nonpartisan constituency that will hold the school and the school district accountable for achieving high academic standards; and

(6) the agency.

(d) A grant from the fund shall be made directly to the school and may be used for the training and development of school staff, parents, and community leaders in order that they understand and implement the academic standards and practices necessary for high academic achievement, appropriate strategies to deregulate and restructure the school in order to improve student achievement, and effective strategies to organize parents and community leaders into a large, nonpartisan constituency that will hold the school and the school district accountable for achieving high academic standards. The grant may be used to implement strategies developed by the partners that are designed to enrich or extend student learning experiences outside of the regular school day.

(e) The commissioner may make a grant of up to $50,000 each academic year to an eligible school. Campus administration personnel of a school that receives a grant under this section are accountable to the commissioner of education and must demonstrate:

(1) the responsible use of the grant to achieve campus deregulation and restructuring to improve academic performance;

(2) a comprehensive plan to engage in ongoing development and training of teachers, parents, and community leaders to:

(A) understand academic standards;

(B) develop effective strategies to improve academic performance; and

(C) organize a large constituency of parents and community leaders to hold the school and school district accountable to achieve high academic standards;

(3) ongoing progress in achieving higher academic performance; and

(4) ongoing progress in identifying, training, and organizing parents and community leaders who are holding the school and the school district accountable for achieving high academic standards.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 937, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1328 (H.B. 3646), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 7.025. YMCA ACCOUNT. The YMCA account is a separate account in the general revenue fund. The account is composed of money deposited to the credit of the account under Section 502.299, Transportation Code, as added by Chapter 433, Acts of the 76th Legislature, Regular Session, 1999. The Texas Education Agency administers the account and may spend money credited to the account only to make grants to benefit the youth and government programs sponsored by the Young Men's Christian Associations located in Texas.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 869, Sec. 2(b), eff. June 14, 2001.

Sec. 7.026. DONATIONS FOR USE RELATED TO CARDIOPULMONARY RESUSCITATION (CPR) AND AUTOMATED EXTERNAL DEFIBRILLATOR (AED) INSTRUCTION. (a) The agency may accept donations, including donations of equipment, for use in providing instruction in cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) and the use of an automated external defibrillator (AED) to students. The agency:

(1) shall distribute the donations to school districts for the purpose of providing CPR and AED instruction to students under Sections 28.0023 and 29.903; and

(2) may use a portion of the donations to the extent necessary to pay administrative expenses related to the donations.

(b) The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 814, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2001. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 7.025 by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1275, Sec. 2(11), eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1371 (S.B. 7), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 625 (H.B. 4375), Sec. 1, eff. June 11, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 625 (H.B. 4375), Sec. 2, eff. June 11, 2023.

Sec. 7.027. TEXAS MUSIC FOUNDATION ACCOUNT. (a) The Texas Music Foundation account is established as a separate account in the general revenue fund. The account is composed of money deposited to the credit of the account under Section 504.639, Transportation Code. Money in the account may be used only for the purposes of this section.

(b) The Music, Film, Television, and Multimedia Office in the governor's office shall administer the account. The agency may spend money credited to the account only to make grants to benefit music-related educational and community programs sponsored by nonprofit organizations based in this state. An administration fee of $5 per license plate shall be retained by the Music, Film, Television, and Multimedia Office for performance of administrative duties.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1320, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 7.028. LIMITATION ON COMPLIANCE MONITORING. (a) Except as provided by Section 21.006(k), 22.093(l), 22.096, 28.006, 29.001(5), 29.010(a), 33.006(h), 37.1083, 37.1084, 38.003, or 39.003, the agency may monitor compliance with requirements applicable to a process or program provided by a school district, campus, program, or school granted charters under Chapter 12, including the process described by Subchapter F, Chapter 11, or a program described by Subchapter B, C, D, E, F, H, or I, Chapter 29, or Subchapter A, Chapter 37, only as necessary to ensure:

(1) compliance with federal law and regulations;

(2) financial accountability, including compliance with grant requirements;

(3) data integrity for purposes of:

(A) the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS); and

(B) accountability under Chapters 39 and 39A; and

(4) qualification for funding under Chapter 48.

(b) The board of trustees of a school district or the governing body of an open-enrollment charter school has primary responsibility for ensuring that the district or school complies with all applicable requirements of state educational programs.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 201, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Renumbered from Education Code, Section 7.027 by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 23.001(9), eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1046 (H.B. 1842), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 21.003(1), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 450 (S.B. 2075), Sec. 1, eff. June 4, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.001, eff. June 12, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 938 (S.B. 179), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1046 (S.B. 1365), Sec. 4.01, eff. September 1, 2021.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 896 (H.B. 3), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 7.029. MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING REGARDING EXCHANGE OF INFORMATION FOR STUDENTS IN FOSTER CARE. (a) The agency and the Department of Family and Protective Services shall enter into a memorandum of understanding regarding the exchange of information as appropriate to facilitate the department's evaluation of educational outcomes of students in foster care. The memorandum of understanding must require:

(1) the department to provide the agency each year with demographic information regarding individual students who during the preceding school year were in the conservatorship of the department following an adversarial hearing under Section 262.201, Family Code; and

(2) the agency, in a manner consistent with federal law, to provide the department with aggregate information regarding educational outcomes of students for whom the agency received demographic information under Subdivision (1).

(b) For purposes of Subsection (a)(2), information regarding educational outcomes includes information relating to student academic achievement, graduation rates, school attendance, disciplinary actions, and receipt of special education services.

(b-1) To facilitate implementation of Subsection (a)(2), the agency shall, in the manner established by commissioner rule, collect data through the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS) as to the foster care status of students.

(c) The department may authorize the agency to provide education research centers established under Section 1.005 with demographic information regarding individual students received by the agency in accordance with Subsection (a)(1), as appropriate to allow the centers to perform additional analysis regarding educational outcomes of students in foster care. Any use of information regarding individual students provided to a center under this subsection must be approved by the department.

(d) Nothing in this section may be construed to:

(1) require the agency or the department to collect or maintain additional information regarding students in foster care; or

(2) allow the release of information regarding an individual student in a manner not permitted under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (20 U.S.C. Section 1232g) or another state or federal law.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1372 (S.B. 939), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 758 (S.B. 833), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 7.031. GRANTS. (a) The agency may seek, accept, and distribute grants awarded by the federal government or any other public or private entity for the benefit of public education, subject to the limitations or conditions imposed by the terms of the grants or by other law.

(b) Unless otherwise prohibited by federal law, the commissioner may determine, solely for purposes of the program's eligibility to receive federal grant funds, for the purpose of technology services and support, that a Head Start program operated in this state by a school district or a community-based organization serves the function of an elementary school by providing elementary education at one or more program facilities.

(c) A determination by the commissioner under Subsection (b):

(1) does not entitle a Head Start program to receive state funds for which the program would not otherwise be eligible;

(2) may not reduce the amount of federal grant funds available for school districts and open-enrollment charter schools; and

(3) may not be appealed.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 603 (H.B. 635), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Sec. 7.037. REPORTING SCHEDULE. (a) To the extent possible, the Texas Education Agency shall develop and maintain a comprehensive schedule that addresses each reporting requirement generally applicable to a school district, including requirements imposed by a state agency or entity other than the Texas Education Agency, and that specifies the date by which a school district must comply with each requirement.

(b) A state agency that requires a school district to periodically report information to that agency shall provide the Texas Education Agency with information regarding the reporting requirement as necessary to enable the Texas Education Agency to develop and maintain the schedule required by Subsection (a).

(c) The Texas Education Agency shall determine the appropriate format of the schedule required by Subsection (a) and the manner in which the schedule is made readily accessible to school districts.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1156 (H.B. 3041), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 7.040. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION AND CAREER OPPORTUNITIES. (a) The agency shall prepare information comparing institutions of higher education in this state and post the information on the agency's Internet website. Information prepared under this section shall be made publicly available in a manner that is accessible to any public or private school student seeking the information. The information shall:

(1) identify postsecondary education and career opportunities, including information that states the benefits of four-year and two-year higher education programs, postsecondary technical education, skilled workforce careers, and career education programs;

(2) assist prospective postsecondary students in assessing the value of a certificate program, associate or baccalaureate degree program, or other credential program offered by an institution of higher education by comparing each institution with other institutions using information included in the electronic tools or platforms developed by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board under Section 61.09022(a);

(3) identify the state's future workforce needs, as projected by the Texas Workforce Commission;

(4) include annual starting wage information and educational requirements for the top 25 highest demand jobs in this state, as identified by the Texas Workforce Commission;

(5) identify the 40 baccalaureate degree programs with the highest average annual wages following graduation; and

(6) identify the 20 associate degree or certificate programs with the highest average annual wages following graduation.

(b) The agency shall collaborate with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board and the Texas Workforce Commission to obtain the information required under Subsection (a). The agency shall incorporate the use of existing materials and develop new materials to be provided to counselors, students, and parents regarding institutions of higher education.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 299 (H.B. 1296), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 378 (H.B. 8), Sec. 1, eff. June 9, 2023.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1011 (H.B. 2920), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER C. COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION

Sec. 7.051. SELECTION OF THE COMMISSIONER. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint the commissioner of education.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.052. TERM OF OFFICE. The commissioner serves a term of office of four years commensurate with the term of the governor.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.053. REMOVAL FROM OFFICE. The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, may remove the commissioner from office as provided by Section 9, Article XV, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.054. QUALIFICATION. The commissioner must be a citizen of the United States.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.055. COMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The commissioner has the powers and duties provided by Subsection (b).

(b)(1) The commissioner shall serve as the educational leader of the state.

(2) The commissioner shall serve as executive officer of the agency and as executive secretary of the board.

(3) The commissioner shall carry out the duties imposed on the commissioner by the board or the legislature.

(4) The commissioner shall prescribe a uniform system of forms, reports, and records necessary to fulfill the reporting and recordkeeping requirements of this title.

(5) The commissioner may delegate ministerial and executive functions to agency staff and may employ division heads and any other employees and clerks to perform the duties of the agency.

(6) The commissioner shall adopt an annual budget for operating the Foundation School Program as prescribed by Subsection (c).

(7) The commissioner may issue vouchers for the expenditures of the agency and shall examine and must approve any account to be paid out of the school funds before the comptroller may issue a warrant.

(8) Repealed by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083, Sec. 25(7), eff. June 17, 2011.

(9) The commissioner shall have a manual published at least once every two years that contains Title 1 and this title, any other provisions of this code relating specifically to public primary or secondary education, and an appendix of all other state laws relating to public primary or secondary education and shall provide for the distribution of the manual as determined by the board.

(10) The commissioner may visit different areas of this state, address teachers' associations and educational gatherings, instruct teachers, and promote all aspects of education and may be reimbursed for necessary travel expenses incurred under this subdivision to the extent authorized by the General Appropriations Act.

(11) The commissioner may appoint advisory committees, in accordance with Chapter 2110, Government Code, as necessary to advise the commissioner in carrying out the duties and mission of the agency.

(12) The commissioner shall appoint an agency auditor.

(13) The commissioner may provide for reductions in the number of agency employees.

(14) The commissioner shall carry out duties relating to the investment capital fund under Section 7.024.

(15) The commissioner shall review and act, if necessary, on applications for waivers under Section 7.056.

(16) The commissioner shall carry out duties relating to regional education service centers as specified under Chapter 8.

(17) The commissioner shall distribute funds to open-enrollment charter schools as required under Subchapter D, Chapter 12.

(18) The commissioner shall adopt a recommended appraisal process and criteria on which to appraise the performance of teachers, a recommended appraisal process and criteria on which to appraise the performance of administrators, and a job description and evaluation form for use in evaluating school counselors, as provided by Subchapter H, Chapter 21.

(19) The commissioner shall coordinate and implement teacher recruitment programs under Section 21.004.

(20) The commissioner shall perform duties in connection with the certification and assignment of hearing examiners as provided by Subchapter F, Chapter 21.

(21) The commissioner shall carry out duties under the Texas Advanced Placement Incentive Program under Subchapter C, Chapter 28.

(22) The commissioner may adopt rules for optional extended year programs under Section 29.082.

(23) The commissioner shall monitor and evaluate prekindergarten programs and other child-care programs as required under Section 29.154.

(24) The commissioner, with the approval of the board, shall develop and implement a plan for the coordination of services to children with disabilities as required under Section 30.001.

(25) The commissioner shall develop a system to distribute to school districts or regional education service centers a special supplemental allowance for students with visual impairments as required under Section 30.002.

(26) The commissioner, with the assistance of the comptroller, shall determine amounts to be distributed to the Texas School for the Blind and Visually Impaired and the Texas School for the Deaf as provided by Section 30.003 and to the Texas Juvenile Justice Department as provided by Section 30.102.

(27) The commissioner shall establish a procedure for resolution of disputes between a school district and the Texas School for the Blind and Visually Impaired under Section 30.021.

(28) The commissioner shall perform duties relating to the funding, adoption, and purchase of instructional materials under Chapter 31.

(29) The commissioner may enter into contracts concerning technology in the public school system as authorized under Chapter 32.

(30) The commissioner shall adopt a recommended contract form for the use, acquisition, or lease with option to purchase of school buses under Section 34.009.

(31) The commissioner shall ensure that the cost of using school buses for a purpose other than the transportation of students to or from school is properly identified in the Public Education Information Management System (PEIMS) under Section 34.010.

(32) The commissioner shall perform duties in connection with the public school accountability system as prescribed by Chapters 39 and 39A.

(33) Repealed by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 397, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

(34) The commissioner shall perform duties in connection with the options for local revenue levels in excess of entitlement under Chapter 49.

(35) The commissioner shall perform duties in connection with the Foundation School Program as prescribed by Chapter 48.

(36) The commissioner shall establish advisory guidelines relating to the fiscal management of a school district and report annually to the board on the status of school district fiscal management as required under Section 44.001.

(37) The commissioner shall review school district audit reports as required under Section 44.008.

(38) The commissioner shall perform duties in connection with the guaranteed bond program as prescribed by Subchapter C, Chapter 45.

(39) The commissioner shall cooperate with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board in connection with the Texas partnership and scholarship program under Subchapter Q, Chapter 61.

(40) The commissioner shall suspend the certificate of an educator or permit of a teacher who violates Chapter 617, Government Code.

(41) The commissioner shall adopt rules relating to extracurricular activities under Section 33.081 and approve or disapprove University Interscholastic League rules and procedures under Section 33.083.

(c) The budget the commissioner adopts under Subsection (b) for operating the Foundation School Program must be in accordance with legislative appropriations and provide funds for the administration and operation of the agency and any other necessary expense. The budget must designate any expense of operating the agency or operating a program for which the board has responsibility that is paid from the Foundation School Program. The budget must designate program expenses that may be paid out of the foundation school fund, other state funds, fees, federal funds, or funds earned under interagency contract. Before adopting the budget, the commissioner must submit the budget to the board for review and, after receiving any comments of the board, present the operating budget to the governor and the Legislative Budget Board. The commissioner shall provide appropriate information on proposed budget expenditures to the comptroller to assure that all payments are paid from the appropriate funds in a timely and efficient manner.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, the commissioner's power to delegate ministerial and executive functions under Subsection (b)(5) is a valid delegation of authority.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 6.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1423, Sec. 5.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 397, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.001(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 91 (S.B. 1303), Sec. 27.002(3), eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1083 (S.B. 1179), Sec. 25(7), eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 2, eff. July 19, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 443 (S.B. 715), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 21.003(2), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.001, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1046 (S.B. 1365), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 7.056. WAIVERS AND EXEMPTIONS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (e), a school campus or district may apply to the commissioner for a waiver of a requirement, restriction, or prohibition imposed by this code or rule of the board or commissioner.

(b) A school campus or district seeking a waiver must submit a written application to the commissioner not later than the 31st day before the campus or district intends to take action requiring a waiver. The application must include:

(1) a written plan approved by the board of trustees of the district that states the achievement objectives of the campus or district and the inhibition imposed on those objectives by the requirement, restriction, or prohibition; and

(2) written comments from the campus- or district-level committee established under Section 11.251.

(c) If the commissioner objects to an application for a waiver, the commissioner must notify the school campus or district in writing that the application is denied not later than the 30th day after the date on which the application is received. If the commissioner does not notify the school campus or district of an objection within that time, the application is considered granted.

(d) A waiver granted under this section is effective for the period stated in the application, which may not exceed three years. A school campus or district for which a requirement, restriction, or prohibition is waived under this section for a period of three years may receive an exemption from that requirement, restriction, or prohibition at the end of that period if the campus or district has fulfilled the achievement objectives stated in the application. The exemption remains in effect until the commissioner determines that achievement levels of the campus or district have declined.

(e) Except as provided by Subsection (f), a school campus or district may not receive an exemption or waiver under this section from:

(1) a prohibition on conduct that constitutes a criminal offense;

(2) a requirement imposed by federal law or rule, including a requirement for special education or bilingual education programs; or

(3) a requirement, restriction, or prohibition relating to:

(A) essential knowledge or skills under Section 28.002 or high school graduation requirements under Section 28.025;

(B) public school accountability as provided by Subchapters B, C, D, and J, Chapter 39, and Chapter 39A;

(C) extracurricular activities under Section 33.081 or participation in a University Interscholastic League area, regional, or state competition under Section 33.0812;

(D) health and safety under Chapter 38;

(E) purchasing under Subchapter B, Chapter 44;

(F) elementary school class size limits, except as provided by Section 25.112;

(G) removal of a disruptive student from the classroom under Subchapter A, Chapter 37;

(H) at-risk programs under Subchapter C, Chapter 29;

(I) prekindergarten programs under Subchapter E, Chapter 29;

(J) educator rights and benefits under Subchapters A, C, D, E, F, G, and I, Chapter 21, or under Subchapter A, Chapter 22;

(K) special education programs under Subchapter A, Chapter 29;

(L) bilingual education programs under Subchapter B, Chapter 29; or

(M) the requirements for the first day of instruction under Section 25.0811.

(f) A school district or campus that is required to develop and implement a student achievement improvement plan under Subchapter A, Chapter 39A, or Section 39A.051 may receive an exemption or waiver under this section from any law or rule other than:

(1) a prohibition on conduct that constitutes a criminal offense;

(2) a requirement imposed by federal law or rule;

(3) a requirement, restriction, or prohibition imposed by state law or rule relating to:

(A) public school accountability as provided by Subchapters B, C, D, and J, Chapter 39, and Chapter 39A; or

(B) educator rights and benefits under Subchapters A, C, D, E, F, G, and I, Chapter 21, or under Subchapter A, Chapter 22; or

(4) selection of instructional materials under Chapter 31.

(g) In a manner consistent with waiver authority granted to the commissioner by the United States Department of Education, the commissioner may grant a waiver of a state law or rule required by federal law, including Subchapter A, B, or C, Chapter 29. Before exercising any waiver authority under this subsection, the commissioner shall notify the Legislative Budget Board and the office of budget and planning in the governor's office.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 342, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 812 (S.B. 658), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2006, 79th Leg., 3rd C.S., Ch. 5 (H.B. 1), Sec. 9.01, eff. May 31, 2006.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 895 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 3, eff. July 19, 2011.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 21.003(3), eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 7.0561. TEXAS HIGH PERFORMANCE SCHOOLS CONSORTIUM. (a) In this section, "consortium" means the Texas High Performance Schools Consortium established under this section.

(b) The Texas High Performance Schools Consortium is established to inform the governor, legislature, State Board of Education, and commissioner concerning methods for transforming public schools in this state by improving student learning through the development of innovative, next-generation learning standards and assessment and accountability systems, including standards and systems relating to career and college readiness.

(c) From among school districts and eligible open-enrollment charter schools that apply using the form and in the time and manner established by commissioner rule, the commissioner may select not more than 30 participants for the consortium. The districts selected by the commissioner must represent a range of district types, sizes, and diverse student populations, as determined by the commissioner in accordance with commissioner rule. To be eligible to participate in the consortium, an open-enrollment charter school must have been awarded a distinction designation under Subchapter G, Chapter 39, during the preceding school year.

(d) The number of students enrolled in consortium participants may not be greater than a number equal to 10 percent of the total number of students enrolled in public schools in this state according to the most recent agency data.

(e) The application process under Subsection (c) must require school districts and open-enrollment charter schools applying to participate in the consortium to submit a detailed plan designed to both support improved instruction of and learning by students and provide evidence of the accurate assessment of the quality of learning on campuses. The plan submitted by a school district may designate the entire district or one or more district campuses as proposed consortium participants. The plan submitted by a district or open-enrollment charter school must include:

(1) a clear description of each assessed curricular goal included in the learning standards adopted in accordance with Subsection (f)(2);

(2) a plan for acquiring resources to support teachers in improving student learning;

(3) a description of any waiver of an applicable prohibition, requirement, or restriction the district or charter school would want to apply for; and

(4) any other provisions required by the commissioner.

(f) In consultation with interested school districts, open-enrollment charter schools, and other appropriate interested persons, the commissioner shall adopt rules applicable to the consortium, according to the following principles for a next generation of higher performing public schools:

(1) engagement of students in digital learning, including engagement through the use of electronic textbooks and instructional materials adopted under Subchapters B and B-1, Chapter 31, and courses offered through the state virtual school network under Subchapter 30A;

(2) emphasis on learning standards that focus on high-priority standards identified in coordination with districts and charter schools participating in the consortium;

(3) use of multiple assessments of learning capable of being used to inform students, parents, districts, and charter schools on an ongoing basis concerning the extent to which learning is occurring and the actions consortium participants are taking to improve learning; and

(4) reliance on local control that enables communities and parents to be involved in the important decisions regarding the education of their children.

(g) The commissioner shall convene consortium leaders periodically to discuss methods to transform learning opportunities for all students, build cross-district and cross-school support systems and training, and share best practices tools and processes.

(h) The commissioner or a school district or open-enrollment charter school participating in the consortium may, for purposes of this section, accept gifts, grants, or donations from any source, including a private entity or governmental entity.

(i) To cover the costs of administering the consortium, the commissioner may charge a fee to a school district or open-enrollment charter school participating in the consortium.

(j) The school districts and open-enrollment charter schools participating in the consortium shall submit reports concerning the performance and progress of the consortium to the governor, the legislature, the State Board of Education, and the commissioner not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 666 (S.B. 1557), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 988 (H.B. 18), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Sec. 7.057. APPEALS. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (e), a person may appeal in writing to the commissioner if the person is aggrieved by:

(1) the school laws of this state; or

(2) actions or decisions of any school district board of trustees that violate:

(A) the school laws of this state; or

(B) a provision of a written employment contract between the school district and a school district employee, if a violation causes or would cause monetary harm to the employee.

(a-1) A person is not required to appeal to the commissioner before pursuing a remedy under a law outside of Title 1 or this title to which Title 1 or this title makes reference or with which Title 1 or this title requires compliance.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (c), the commissioner after due notice to the parties interested shall, not later than the 180th day after the date an appeal under Subsection (a) is filed, hold a hearing and issue a decision without cost to the parties involved. In conducting a hearing under this subsection, the commissioner has the same authority relating to discovery and conduct of a hearing as a hearing examiner has under Subchapter F, Chapter 21. This section does not deprive any party of any legal remedy.

(c) In an appeal against a school district, the commissioner shall, not later than the 240th day after the date the appeal is filed, issue a decision based on a review of the record developed at the district level under a substantial evidence standard of review. The parties to the appeal may agree in writing to extend, by not more than 60 days, the date by which the commissioner must issue a decision under this subsection. A school district's disclosure of the record to the commissioner under this subsection is not an offense under Section 551.146, Government Code.

(d) A person aggrieved by an action of the agency or decision of the commissioner may appeal to a district court in Travis County. An appeal must be made by serving the commissioner with citation issued and served in the manner provided by law for civil suits. The petition must state the action or decision from which the appeal is taken. At trial, the court shall determine all issues of law and fact, except as provided by Section 33.081(g).

(e) This section does not apply to:

(1) a case to which Subchapter G, Chapter 21, applies; or

(2) a student disciplinary action under Chapter 37.

(f) In this section:

(1) "Record" includes, at a minimum, an audible electronic recording or written transcript of all oral testimony or argument.

(2) "School laws of this state" means Title 1 and this title and rules adopted under those titles.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 895, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1111 (H.B. 829), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 371 (H.B. 2952), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 7.058. RESEARCH ON MATHEMATICS SKILLS ACQUISITION AND PROGRAM EFFECTIVENESS. From funds appropriated for the purpose, the commissioner shall award to one or more institutions that have demonstrated an ability to conduct science-based research on effective instructional strategies that improve student performance in mathematics a grant to be used to:

(1) develop and identify research on mathematics skills acquisition and student learning in mathematics;

(2) monitor the effectiveness of mathematics achievement academies under Section 21.4553 based on performance in mathematics by the students of teachers who have attended an academy;

(3) examine the effect of mathematics achievement academies on the classroom performance of teachers who have attended an academy;

(4) identify common practices used at high-performing school campuses that lead to improved student performance in mathematics; and

(5) develop research on cognitive development in children concerning mathematics skills development.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 834, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1045 (S.B. 1267), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2021.

Sec. 7.059. MATHEMATICS HOMEWORK AND GRADING SERVICE. (a) From funds appropriated for the purpose, the commissioner shall help make available services that assist teachers in providing and grading mathematics homework assignments. The services may also assist teachers in providing and grading student examinations.

(b) In helping make the services described by Subsection (a) available, the commissioner shall consider all methods available through advanced technology, especially methods using the Internet, to distribute mathematics homework assignments and to provide immediate assessment of a student's work on the assignment.

(c) Each homework assignment offered through the service:

(1) must be created with consideration for the underlying mathematical skills required to be taught at the grade level for which the assignment is designed;

(2) may be based on a step-by-step procedure for solving mathematical problems provided by the assignment that may be adapted to individual student and instructor needs;

(3) may be accompanied by a solution to each mathematical problem assigned;

(4) may be accompanied by other pedagogically valuable material appropriate for a particular student; and

(5) to the extent possible, should correlate to an instructional program or programs being used in classrooms in this state.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 834, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 7.060. REDUCING PAPERWORK. (a) At least once each even-numbered year, the commissioner shall review and, to the greatest extent practicable, reduce written reports and other paperwork required of a school district by the agency.

(a-1) The review conducted under Subsection (a) must include a comparison of the reports and paperwork required by state law and the reports and paperwork required by federal law. The commissioner shall eliminate any reports or paperwork required by state law that duplicate the content of reports or paperwork also required by federal law.

(b) The commissioner shall adopt a policy that limits written reports and other paperwork that a principal or classroom teacher may be required by the agency to complete.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, a school district shall submit only in electronic format all reports required to be submitted to the agency under this code. The agency shall prescribe the electronic format to be used by a school district submitting a report to the agency.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 723 (S.B. 493), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 668 (S.B. 1618), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1042 (H.B. 1706), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2015.

Sec. 7.061. FACILITIES STANDARDS. (a) In this section, "instructional facility" has the meaning assigned by Section 46.001.

(b) The commissioner shall adopt or amend rules as necessary to ensure that facilities standards for new and existing instructional facilities and other school district and open-enrollment charter school facilities, including construction quality, performance, operational, and other standards related to the safety and security of school facilities, provide a secure and safe environment. In adopting or amending rules under this section, the commissioner shall include the use of best practices for:

(1) the design and construction of new facilities; and

(2) the improvement, renovation, and retrofitting of existing facilities.

(c) Not later than September 1 of each even-numbered year, the commissioner shall review all rules adopted or amended under this section and amend the rules as necessary to ensure that facilities standards for school district and open-enrollment charter school facilities continue to provide a secure and safe environment. The commissioner shall, in consultation with the Texas School Safety Center, identify and adopt any changes recommended under Section 37.221.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 464 (S.B. 11), Sec. 1, eff. June 6, 2019.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 896 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 7.062. SCIENCE LABORATORY GRANT PROGRAM. (a) In this section, "wealth per student" means a school district's taxable value of property as determined under Subchapter M, Chapter 403, Government Code, or, if applicable, Section 48.258, divided by the district's average daily attendance as determined under Section 48.005.

(b) The commissioner shall establish a program to provide competitive grants to school districts for the purpose of constructing or renovating high school science laboratories.

(c) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, if the commissioner certifies that the amount appropriated for a state fiscal year for purposes of Subchapters A and B, Chapter 46, exceeds the amount to which school districts are entitled under those subchapters for that year, the commissioner shall use the excess funds, in an amount not to exceed $20 million in any state fiscal year, for the purpose of making grants under this section. The use of excess funds under this subsection has priority over any provision of Chapter 48 that permits or directs the use of excess foundation school program funds, including Sections 48.258, 48.259, and 48.267. The commissioner is required to use excess funds as provided by this subsection only if the commissioner is not required to reduce the total amount of state funds allocated to school districts under Section 48.266(f).

(d) The commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement the program, including rules addressing eligibility, application procedures, and accountability for use of grant funds.

(e) The rules must:

(1) limit the amount of assistance provided through a grant to not more than:

(A) for a construction project, $200 per square foot of the science laboratory to be constructed; or

(B) for a renovation project, $100 per square foot of the science laboratory to be renovated;

(2) require a school district to demonstrate, as a condition of eligibility for a grant, that the existing district science laboratories are insufficient in number to comply with the curriculum requirements imposed for the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program under Section 28.025; and

(3) provide for ranking school districts that apply for grants on the basis of wealth per student and giving priority in the award of grants to districts with low wealth per student.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1058 (H.B. 2237), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 2(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.002, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 7.063. PERSON FIRST RESPECTFUL LANGUAGE PROMOTION. The commissioner shall ensure that the agency uses the terms and phrases listed as preferred under the person first respectful language initiative in Chapter 392, Government Code, when proposing, adopting, or amending the agency's rules, reference materials, publications, and electronic media.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 272 (H.B. 1481), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 7.064. CAREER AND TECHNOLOGY CONSORTIUM. (a) The commissioner shall investigate available options for the state to join a consortium of states for the purpose of developing sequences of academically rigorous career and technology courses in career areas that are high-demand, high-wage career areas in this state.

(b) The curricula for the courses must include the appropriate essential knowledge and skills adopted under Subchapter A, Chapter 28.

(c) If the commissioner determines that joining a consortium of states for this purpose would be beneficial for the educational and career success of students in the state, the commissioner may join the consortium on behalf of the state.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 3, eff. June 10, 2013.

Sec. 7.065. TEACHING AND LEARNING CONDITIONS SURVEY. (a) The commissioner shall develop an online survey to be administered statewide at least biennially to superintendents, principals, supervisors, classroom teachers, counselors, and other appropriate full-time professional employees who are required to hold a certificate issued under Subchapter B, Chapter 21.

(b) In developing the survey under this section, the commissioner shall ensure that the survey is designed to elicit information relating to the following issues:

(1) teaching and learning conditions as predictors of student achievement and growth;

(2) the relationship between teaching and learning conditions and teacher retention;

(3) the influence of school leadership on teaching and learning conditions, including:

(A) meaningful involvement of teachers in determining professional development needs;

(B) meaningful involvement of teachers in campus decisions and initiatives;

(C) support for teachers in student disciplinary matters; and

(D) limiting required meetings for and noninstructional duties of teachers;

(4) the relationship between teaching and learning conditions and student attendance and graduation;

(5) the appropriate time during the day for collaborative instructional planning;

(6) facilities resources needs; and

(7) other supports needed for educators to be successful in the classroom.

(c) The commissioner shall contract with a third-party entity with appropriate research and evaluation expertise to administer the survey required by this section. The third-party survey administrator shall collect responses and protect the identity of the respondents. The third-party survey administrator shall provide the survey responses to the commissioner or a person designated by the commissioner not later than the 60th day after the date the survey is administered.

(d) After the administration of each survey, the commissioner shall:

(1) make the survey results available to the public; and

(2) provide the survey results to school districts and campuses.

(e) Each school district and campus shall use the survey results:

(1) to review and revise, as appropriate, district-level or campus-level improvement plans in the manner provided under Subchapter F, Chapter 11; and

(2) for other purposes, as appropriate to enhance the district and campus learning environment.

(f) The commissioner shall use the survey results to develop, review, and revise:

(1) agency professional development offerings;

(2) agency initiatives aimed at teacher retention; and

(3) standards for principals and superintendents.

(g) The commissioner shall carry out duties under this section, including contracting for the administration of the survey, using only available funds and resources from public and private sources.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1282 (H.B. 2012), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Redesignated from Education Code, Section 7.064 by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 21.001(7), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 7.070. COORDINATION OF DATA COLLECTION. The commissioner may enter into agreements with appropriate entities as necessary to provide for the collection of data regarding college, career, and military readiness of public school students, including data maintained by:

(1) governmental agencies of the United States, this state, or another state;

(2) political subdivisions of this state or another state;

(3) public or private institutions of higher education; and

(4) relevant private organizations.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 2.002, eff. June 12, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER D. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION

Sec. 7.101. COMPOSITION. (a) The State Board of Education is composed of 15 members elected from districts.

(b) Members of the board are elected at biennial general elections held in compliance with the Election Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 72 (H.B. 600), Sec. 3(a), eff. August 29, 2011.

Sec. 7.102. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The board may perform only those duties relating to school districts or regional education service centers assigned to the board by the constitution of this state or by this subchapter or another provision of this code.

(b) The board has the powers and duties provided by Subsection (c), which shall be carried out with the advice and assistance of the commissioner.

(c)(1) The board shall develop and update a long-range plan for public education.

(2) The board may enter into contracts relating to or accept grants for the improvement of educational programs specifically authorized by statute.

(3) The board may accept a gift, donation, or other contribution on behalf of the public school system or agency and, unless otherwise specified by the donor, may use the contribution in the manner the board determines.

(4) The board shall establish curriculum and graduation requirements.

(5) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 4.001(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

(6) The board may create special-purpose school districts under Chapter 11.

(7) The board shall provide for a training course for school district trustees under Section 11.159.

(8) The board shall adopt a procedure to be used for placing on probation or revoking a home-rule school district charter as required by Subchapter B, Chapter 12, and may place on probation or revoke a home-rule school district charter as provided by that subchapter.

(9) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 439 (S.B. 1376), Sec. 4.01(a)(1), eff. June 4, 2019.

(10) The board shall adopt rules establishing criteria for certifying hearing examiners as provided by Section 21.252.

(11) The board shall adopt rules to carry out the curriculum required or authorized under Section 28.002.

(12) The board shall establish guidelines for credit by examination under Section 28.023.

(13) The board shall adopt transcript forms and standards for differentiating high school programs for purposes of reporting academic achievement under Section 28.025.

(14) The board shall adopt guidelines for determining financial need for purposes of the Texas Advanced Placement Incentive Program under Subchapter C, Chapter 28, and may approve payments as provided by that subchapter.

(15) The board shall adopt criteria for identifying gifted and talented students and shall develop and update a state plan for the education of gifted and talented students as required under Subchapter D, Chapter 29.

(16) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 73, Sec. 2.06(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2013.

(17) The board shall adopt rules relating to community education development projects as required under Section 29.257.

(18) The board may approve the plan to be developed and implemented by the commissioner for the coordination of services to children with disabilities as required under Section 30.001.

(19) The board shall establish a date by which each school district and state institution shall provide to the commissioner the necessary information to determine the district's share of the cost of the education of a student enrolled in the Texas School for the Blind and Visually Impaired or the Texas School for the Deaf as required under Section 30.003 and may adopt other rules concerning funding of the education of students enrolled in the Texas School for the Blind and Visually Impaired or the Texas School for the Deaf as authorized under Section 30.003.

(20) The board shall adopt rules prescribing the form and content of information school districts are required to provide concerning programs offered by state institutions as required under Section 30.004.

(21) The board shall adopt rules concerning admission of students to the Texas School for the Deaf as required under Section 30.057.

(22) The board shall carry out powers and duties related to regional day school programs for the deaf as provided under Subchapter D, Chapter 30.

(23) The board shall adopt and purchase or license instructional materials as provided by Chapter 31 and adopt rules required by that chapter.

(24) The board shall develop and update a long-range plan concerning technology in the public school system as required under Section 32.001 and shall adopt rules and policies concerning technology in public schools as provided by Chapter 32.

(25) The board shall conduct feasibility studies related to the telecommunications capabilities of school districts and regional education service centers as provided by Section 32.033.

(26) The board shall appoint a board of directors of the center for educational technology under Section 32.034.

(27) Repealed by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.001(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

(28) The board shall approve a program for testing students for dyslexia and related disorders as provided by Section 38.003. The program may not include a distinction between standard protocol dyslexia instruction, as defined by the Dyslexia Handbook: Procedures Concerning Dyslexia and Related Disorders, as updated in 2021 and adopted by the State Board of Education, and its subsequent amendments, and other types of direct dyslexia instruction, including specially designed instruction.

(29) The board shall perform duties in connection with the public school accountability system as prescribed by Chapters 39 and 39A.

(30) The board shall perform duties in connection with the Foundation School Program as prescribed by Chapter 48.

(31) The board may invest the permanent school fund within the limits of the authority granted by Section 5, Article VII, Texas Constitution, and Chapter 43.

(32) The board shall adopt rules concerning school district budgets and audits of school district fiscal accounts as required under Subchapter A, Chapter 44.

(33) The board shall adopt an annual report on the status of the guaranteed bond program and may adopt rules as necessary for the administration of the program as provided under Subchapter C, Chapter 45.

(34) The board shall prescribe uniform bid blanks for school districts to use in selecting a depository bank as required under Section 45.206.

(d) The board may adopt rules relating to school districts or regional education service centers only as required to carry out the specific duties assigned to the board by the constitution or under Subsection (c).

(e) An action of the board to adopt a rule under this section is effective only if the board includes in the rule's preamble a statement of the specific authority under Subsection (c) to adopt the rule.

(f) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, a rule adopted by the board under this section does not take effect until the beginning of the school year that begins at least 90 days after the date on which the rule was adopted. The rule takes effect earlier if the rule's preamble specifies an earlier effective date and the reason for that earlier date and:

(1) the earlier effective date is a requirement of:

(A) a federal law; or

(B) a state law that specifically refers to this section and expressly requires the adoption of an earlier effective date; or

(2) on the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the members of the board, the board makes a finding that an earlier effective date is necessary.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 6.01, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 268, Sec. 2, eff. May 26, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1482, Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.001(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 4, eff. July 19, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 73 (S.B. 307), Sec. 2.06(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 324 (S.B. 1488), Sec. 21.003(4), eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 439 (S.B. 1376), Sec. 4.01(a)(1), eff. June 4, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.003, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 4.001(a)(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 542 (H.B. 3928), Sec. 2, eff. June 10, 2023.

Sec. 7.103. ELIGIBILITY FOR MEMBERSHIP. (a) A person is not eligible for election to or service on the board if the person holds an office with this state or any political subdivision of this state.

(b) A person may not be elected from or serve in a district who is not a bona fide resident of the district with one year's continuous residence before election. A person is not eligible for election to or service on the board unless the person is a qualified voter of the district in which the person resides and is at least 26 years of age.

(c) A person who is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, by virtue of the person's activities for compensation in or on behalf of a profession, business, or association related to the operation of the board, may not serve as a member of the board or act as the general counsel to the board.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.104. TERMS. (a) At each general election immediately following a decennial reapportionment of districts, one member shall be elected to the board from each district. Except as provided by Subsection (b), members of the board serve staggered terms of four years with the terms of eight members expiring on January 1 of one odd-numbered year and the terms of seven members expiring on January 1 of the next odd-numbered year.

(b) Seven members of the board elected at each general election following a decennial reapportionment of districts shall serve two-year terms and eight members shall serve four-year terms. Members shall draw lots to determine who serves which terms.

(c) If a position on the board becomes vacant, the governor shall fill the vacancy as soon as possible by appointing a qualified person from the affected district with the advice and consent of the senate.

(d) A vacancy that occurs at a time when it is impossible to place the name of a candidate for the unexpired term on the general election ballot is filled by appointment, as prescribed by Subsection (c).

(e) An appointment to a vacancy on the board shall be made without regard to the race, creed, sex, religion, or national origin of the appointed member.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.105. COMPENSATION AND REIMBURSEMENT. (a) A member of the board is not entitled to receive compensation.

(b) A member of the board is entitled to reimbursement of the member's expenses as provided by law.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.106. MEETINGS. (a) The board shall hold four meetings a year in Austin, Texas, on dates determined by the chair and may hold other meetings as may be called by the chair.

(b) In a manner that complies with Section 551.128, Government Code, the agency shall broadcast over the Internet live video and audio of each open meeting held by the board. Subsequently, the agency shall make available through the agency's Internet website archived video and audio for each meeting for which live video and audio was provided under this subsection.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 169 (H.B. 772), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 7.107. OFFICERS. (a) The governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint the chair from among the membership of the board. The chair serves a term of two years.

(b) At the board's first regular meeting after the election and qualification of new members, the board shall organize, adopt rules of procedure, and elect by separate votes a vice chair and a secretary.

(c) A person who serves two consecutive terms as chair is ineligible to again serve as chair until four years have elapsed since the expiration of the second term.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.108. PROHIBITION ON POLITICAL CONTRIBUTION OR ACTIVITY. (a) A person interested in selling bonds of any type or a person engaged in manufacturing, shipping, selling, or advertising instructional materials commits an offense if the person makes or authorizes a political contribution to or takes part in, directly or indirectly, the campaign of any person seeking election to or serving on the board.

(b) An offense under Subsection (a) is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) In this section:

(1) "Instructional material" has the meaning assigned by Section 31.002.

(2) "Political contribution" has the meaning assigned by Section 251.001, Election Code.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 5, eff. July 19, 2011.

Sec. 7.109. DESIGNATION AS STATE BOARD FOR CAREER AND TECHNOLOGY EDUCATION. (a) The board is also the State Board for Career and Technology Education.

(b) The commissioner is the executive officer through whom the State Board for Career and Technology Education shall carry out its policies and enforce its rules.

(c) The State Board for Career and Technology Education may contract with the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board or any other state agency to assume the leadership role and administrative responsibility of the State Board for Career and Technology Education for state level administration of technical-vocational education programs in public community colleges, public technical institutes, and other eligible public postsecondary institutions in this state.

(d) The State Board for Career and Technology Education may allocate funds appropriated to the board by the legislature or federal funds received by the board under the Carl D. Perkins Vocational Education Act (20 U.S.C. Section 2301 et seq.) or other federal law to an institution or program approved by the State Board of Education, the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, or another state agency specified by law.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.110. PUBLIC TESTIMONY. The board shall develop and implement policies that provide the public with a reasonable opportunity to appear before the board and to speak on any issue under the jurisdiction of the board.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Sec. 7.111. HIGH SCHOOL EQUIVALENCY EXAMINATIONS. (a) The board shall provide for the administration of high school equivalency examinations.

(a-1) A person who does not have a high school diploma may take the examination in accordance with rules adopted by the board if the person is:

(1) over 17 years of age;

(2) 16 years of age or older and:

(A) is enrolled in a Job Corps training program under the Workforce Investment Act of 1998 (29 U.S.C. Section 2801 et seq.), and its subsequent amendments;

(B) a public agency providing supervision of the person or having custody of the person under a court order recommends that the person take the examination; or

(C) is enrolled in the Texas Military Department's Seaborne ChalleNGe Corps; or

(3) required to take the examination under a court order issued under Section 65.103(a)(3), Family Code.

(b) The board by rule shall establish and require payment of a fee as a condition to the issuance of a high school equivalency certificate and a copy of the scores of the examinations. The fee must be reasonable and designed to cover the administrative costs of issuing the certificate and a copy of the scores. The board may not require a waiting period between the date a person withdraws from school and the date the person takes the examination unless the period relates to the time between administrations of the examination.

(c) The board by rule shall develop and deliver high school equivalency examinations and provide for the administration of the examinations online. The rules must provide a procedure for verifying the identity of the person taking the examination.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1282, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 4.002, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1514, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 818 (S.B. 776), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1078 (S.B. 1094), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 339 (H.B. 2058), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1217 (S.B. 1536), Sec. 2.01, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (H.B. 2398), Sec. 6(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (H.B. 2398), Sec. 6(b), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 5.001(a), eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 5.001(b), eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 7.112. REPRESENTATION OF PUBLISHER OF INSTRUCTIONAL MATERIALS BY FORMER MEMBER OF BOARD. (a) A former member of the State Board of Education who is employed by or otherwise receives compensation from a publisher of instructional materials may not, before the second anniversary of the date on which the person last served as a member of the State Board of Education:

(1) confer with a member of the board of trustees of a school district concerning instructional materials published by that publisher; or

(2) appear at a meeting of the board of trustees on behalf of the publisher.

(b) A person who violates Subsection (a) commits an offense. An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

(c) In this section:

(1) "Compensation" means money, a service, or another thing of value or financial benefit received in return for or in connection with a service provided.

(2) "Instructional material" and "publisher" have the meanings assigned by Section 31.002.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. May 30, 1995.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 6, eff. July 19, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 7, eff. July 19, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., 1st C.S., Ch. 6 (S.B. 6), Sec. 8, eff. July 19, 2011.

Sec. 7.113. EMPLOYERS FOR EDUCATION EXCELLENCE AWARD. (a) The board shall create the Employers for Education Excellence Award to honor employers that implement a policy to encourage and support employees who actively participate in activities of schools.

(b) An employer that meets the criteria described by this section may apply for consideration to receive the award.

(c) The board shall establish the following levels of recognition for employers:

(1) bronze for an employer that implements a policy to encourage and support employees who attend parent-teacher conferences;

(2) silver for an employer that:

(A) meets the requirements of bronze; and

(B) implements a policy to encourage and support employees who volunteer in school activities; and

(3) gold for an employer that:

(A) meets the requirements of silver; and

(B) implements a policy to encourage and support employees who participate in student mentoring programs in schools.

(d) The board shall establish criteria to certify businesses to receive the Employers for Education Excellence Award at the appropriate level of recognition. The commissioner shall review the applications submitted by employers under Subsection (b) and make recommendations to the board regarding businesses that should be recognized and the level at which a business should be recognized. The board may approve or modify the commissioner's recommendation.

(e) The board shall honor the recipient of an Employers for Education Excellence Award by presenting the recipient with a suitable certificate that includes the business's level of recognition and other appropriate information.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 557 (S.B. 1433), Sec. 1, eff. June 16, 2007.